Georgia, session 2025_26, HB185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
20 PART I
21 Dietetics and Nutrition Practices Act
22 SECTION 1-1.
23 Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to professions and businesses,
24 is amended by repealing and reenacting Chapter 11A, the "Dietetics Practice Act," as
25 follows:
26 "CHAPTER 11A
27 ARTICLE 1
28 43-11A-1.
29 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the 'Dietetics and Nutrition Practices Act.'
30 43-11A-2.
31 The General Assembly acknowledges that the application of scientific knowledge relating
32 to the practices of dietetics and nutrition is important in the treatment of diseases and
33 medical conditions and in the attainment and maintenance of health. The General
34 Assembly acknowledges further that the rendering of sound dietetic and nutrition services
35 for the treatment and management of diseases and medical conditions in hospitals, nursing
36 homes, school districts, health departments, private practice and consultation, and other
37 settings requires trained and competent professionals. It is declared, therefore, to be the
38 purpose of this chapter to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public by providing
39 for the licensure of individuals engaged in the practices of dietetics and nutrition, including
40 the provision of medical nutrition therapy.
H. B. 185
- 2 -

25 LC 52 0648
41 43-11A-3.
42 As used in this article, the term:
43 (1) 'ACEND' means the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and Dietetics
44 or its successor organization.
45 (2) 'Advertising' means, but is not limited to, issuing or causing to be distributed any
46 card, sign, or other device; causing or permitting any sign or marking on or in any
47 building or structure or in any newspaper, magazine, or directory; or causing or
48 permitting any announcement on radio or any announcement or display on television, a
49 computer network, or an electronic or telephonic medium.
50 (3) 'Applicant' means an individual seeking a license under this article.
51 (4) 'Board' means the Georgia Board of Examiners of Licensed Dietitians and Licensed
52 Nutritionists established by this article.
53 (5) 'Degree' means a degree received from an accredited college or university or a
54 validated foreign equivalent as recognized by the board by approval, policy, or rule.
55 (6) 'General nonmedical nutrition information' means information on:
56 (A) Principles of human nutrition and food preparation;
57 (B) Principles of self-care and a healthy relationship with food;
58 (C) Essential nutrients needed by the human body;
59 (D) General and nonindividualized recommended amounts of essential nutrients in the
60 human body;
61 (E) Actions of nutrients in the human body;
62 (F) Nonindividualized effects of deficiencies or excesses of nutrients in the human
63 body; or
64 (G) General education surrounding foods, herbs, and dietary supplements that are good
65 sources of essential nutrients in the human body.
66 (7) 'Licensed dietitian' means an individual duly licensed under this chapter as meeting
67 the requirements provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 43-11A-9 to engage in
H. B. 185
- 3 -

25 LC 52 0648
68 the practice of dietetics and the practice of nutrition, including the provision of medical
69 nutrition therapy.
70 (8) 'Licensed nutritionist' means an individual duly licensed under this chapter as
71 meeting the requirements provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 43-11A-9 to
72 engage in the practice of nutrition, including the provision of medical nutrition therapy.
73 (9) 'Medical nutrition therapy' means the provision of any of the following nutrition care
74 services for the treatment or management of a disease or medical condition: nutrition
75 assessment, nutrition diagnosis, nutrition intervention, or nutrition monitoring and
76 evaluation.
77 (10) 'Medical weight control' means medical nutrition therapy provided for the purpose
78 of reducing, maintaining, or gaining weight.
79 (11) 'Nonmedical weight control' means nutrition care services provided for the purpose
80 of reducing, maintaining, or gaining weight that do not constitute the treatment or
81 management of a disease or medical condition. Such term includes weight control
82 services for healthy population groups to achieve or maintain a healthy weight.
83 (12) 'Nutrition assessment' means the ongoing, dynamic, and systematic process of
84 ordering, obtaining, verifying, and interpreting biochemical, anthropometric, physical,
85 nutrigenomic, and dietary data to make decisions about the nature and cause of nutrition
86 related problems relative to patient or community needs. Such term includes the initial
87 data collection and evaluation and any reassessment and analysis of patient or community
88 needs and provides the foundation for nutrition diagnosis and nutritional
89 recommendations and orders. Such term may require ordering laboratory tests to check
90 and track nutritional status. The collection of such data shall not, by itself, constitute
91 nutrition assessment.
92 (13) 'Nutrition care process' means the systematic problem-solving method that licensed
93 dietitians use to critically think and make decisions when providing medical nutrition
94 therapy or to address nutrition related problems and provide safe, effective care. Such
H. B. 185
- 4 -

25 LC 52 0648
95 term consists of four distinct but interrelated steps: nutrition assessment, nutrition
96 diagnosis, nutrition intervention, and nutrition monitoring and evaluation.
97 (14) 'Nutrition care services' means any part or all of the following services provided
98 within a systematic process:
99 (A) Assessing and evaluating the nutritional needs of individuals and groups and
100 determining resources and constraints in a practice setting, including ordering nutrition
101 related laboratory tests to check and track nutrition status;
102 (B) Identifying nutrition problems and establishing priorities, goals, and objectives that
103 meet nutritional needs and are consistent with available resources and constraints;
104 (C) Creating individualized dietary plans and issuing and implementing orders to meet
105 the nutritional needs of healthy individuals and individuals with disease states or
106 medical conditions, including ordering therapeutic diets, and monitoring the
107 effectiveness of such dietary plans and orders;
108 (D) Determining and providing appropriate nutrition interventions in health and
109 disease, including nutrition counseling on food and prescription drug interactions;
110 (E) Developing, implementing, and managing nutrition care processes; or
111 (F) Evaluating, making changes in, and maintaining appropriate standards of quality
112 in food and nutrition services.
113 (15) 'Nutrition counseling' means a supportive process, characterized by a collaborative
114 counselor-patient relationship with individuals or groups, to establish food and nutrition
115 priorities, goals, individualized action plans, and general physical activity guidance that
116 acknowledge and foster responsibility for self-care to promote health and wellness or to
117 treat or manage an existing disease or medical condition.
118 (16) 'Nutrition diagnosis' means identifying and labeling nutritional problems managed
119 and treated by a licensed dietitian but does not include a medical diagnosis of the health
120 status of an individual.
H. B. 185
- 5 -

25 LC 52 0648
121 (17) 'Nutrition intervention' means purposefully planned actions, including nutrition
122 counseling, intended to positively change a nutrition related behavior, risk factor,
123 environmental condition, or aspect of the health status of an individual, his or her family
124 or caregivers, target groups, or a community at large. Such term includes approving,
125 ordering, and monitoring therapeutic diets and providing counseling on food and
126 prescription drug interactions.
127 (18) 'Nutrition monitoring and evaluation' means identifying patient outcomes relevant
128 to a nutrition diagnosis, nutrition intervention plans, and nutrition goals; comparing those
129 outcomes with a patient's previous health status, nutrition intervention plans, and nutrition
130 goals or with a reference standard to determine the progress made in achieving desired
131 outcomes of nutrition care services; and determining whether planned nutrition
132 interventions should be continued, revised, or concluded.
133 (19) 'Patient' means an individual recipient of nutrition care services.
134 (20) 'Practice of dietetics' means the integration and application of scientific principles
135 derived from the study of food, nutrition, biochemistry, metabolism, nutrigenomics,
136 physiology, pharmacology, food systems, management, and behavioral and social
137 sciences to achieve and maintain optimal nutrition status of individuals and groups and
138 includes the practice of nutrition. Such term means primarily the provision of nutrition
139 care services, including medical nutrition therapy, in person or via telehealth, to prevent,
140 manage, or treat acute or chronic diseases or medical conditions and to promote wellness
141 in inpatient and outpatient settings. Consistent with the level of competence of the
142 provider, such term includes developing and ordering therapeutic diets via oral, enteral,
143 and parenteral routes and providing other advanced medical nutrition therapy and related
144 support activities consistent with current competencies required of academic and
145 supervised practice programs accredited by a programmatic accreditor and in accord with
146 the scope and standards of practice published by the Commission on Dietetic Registration
H. B. 185
- 6 -

25 LC 52 0648
147 of the Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics or its successor organization or as may be
148 prescribed by the board.
149 (21) 'Practice of nutrition' means the integration and application of scientific principles
150 derived from the study of nutrition science, cellular and systemic metabolism,
151 biochemistry, physiology, and behavioral sciences to achieve and maintain health
152 throughout the lifespan. Such term means primarily the provision of nutrition care
153 services, including medical nutrition therapy, in person or via telehealth, to prevent,
154 manage, or treat chronic diseases or medical conditions and to promote wellness in
155 outpatient settings. Consistent with the level of competence of the provider, such term
156 may include the ordering of oral therapeutic diets, the ordering of medical laboratory tests
157 related to nutritional therapeutic treatments, and the provision of recommendations on
158 vitamins, minerals, and other dietary supplements.
159 (22) 'Programmatic accreditor' means a nationally recognized organization that reviews
160 specialized and professional programs and includes ACEND and such organizations as
161 recognized by the board by approval, policy, or rule.
162 (23) 'Provisional license' means a temporary license issued by the board pursuant to
163 Code Section 43-11A-10.
164 (24) 'Qualified supervisor' means an individual providing supervision who assumes full
165 professional responsibility for the work of a supervisee by verifying, directing, and
166 approving the provided nutrition care services, medical nutrition therapy, and other work
167 being supervised, as provided for in Code Section 43-11A-19.
168 (25) 'Registered dietitian' means an individual who is credentialed by the Commission
169 on Dietetic Registration of the Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics or its successor
170 organization as a registered dietitian or a registered dietitian nutritionist and is authorized
171 to use such title and the designation 'RD' or 'RDN.'
H. B. 185
- 7 -

25 LC 52 0648
172 (26) 'Supervisee' means a student, intern, or trainee providing nutrition care services,
173 medical nutrition therapy, and other work under the supervision of a qualified supervisor,
174 as provided for in Code Section 43-11A-19.
175 (27) 'Telehealth' means the use of electronic information and telecommunications
176 technologies to provide services under this chapter between a healthcare provider in one
177 location and an individual in another location to support clinical healthcare, public health,
178 patient health related education, and health administration.
179 (28) 'Therapeutic diet' means a diet intervention prescribed by a licensed physician or
180 other authorized nonphysician practitioner that provides food or nutrients via oral,
181 enteral, or parenteral routes as part of the treatment of a disease or medical condition to
182 modify, eliminate, decrease, or increase identified micronutrients and macronutrients in
183 a patient's diet, or to provide mechanically altered food when indicated.
184 (29) 'Unrestricted practice of medical nutrition therapy' means the provision of medical
185 nutrition therapy by an individual who is responsible for his or her own practice or
186 treatment procedures.
187 43-11A-4.
188 (a) The Georgia Board of Examiners of Licensed Dietitians in existence prior to
189 July 1, 2025, is continued in existence thereafter as the Georgia Board of Examiners of
190 Licensed Dietitians and Licensed Nutritionists. Members of the board serving immediately
191 prior to July 1, 2025, shall continue to serve out their respective terms of office and until
192 their successors are appointed and qualified. The board shall consist of nine members
193 representing the licensed professions and public at large as follows:
194 (1) Six board members shall be licensed dietitians, including a clinical dietitian, a
195 community or public health dietitian, an educator specializing in dietetics and on the
196 faculty of a college or university, and a private practice dietitian;
197 (2) One board member shall be a licensed nutritionist;
H. B. 185
- 8 -

25 LC 52 0648
198 (3) One board member shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine under
199 Chapter 34 of this title; and
200 (4) One board member shall represent the public at large.
201 (b) Members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor with the confirmation of the
202 Senate. Members of the board shall take office on the first day of July immediately
203 following the expired terms of that office and shall serve for terms of four years and until
204 their successors are appointed and qualified. Any individual appointed to the board when
205 the Senate is not in session may serve on the board without Senate confirmation until the
206 Senate acts on that appointment. No member shall serve on the board for more than two
207 consecutive terms. Any vacancy shall be filled by the Governor subject to confirmation
208 of the Senate.
209 (c) All members of the board shall be reimbursed as provided for in subsection (f) of Code
210 Section 43-1-2.
211 (d) All members of the board shall take the constitutional oath of office.
212 43-11A-5.
213 (a) Members of the board representing the licensed professions shall:
214 (1) Be citizens of the United States and residents of this state;
215 (2) Have engaged in the practice of dietetics or practice of nutrition for compensation for
216 not less than five years; and
217 (3) Be licensed under this chapter.
218 (b) The member of the board representing the public at large shall be a citizen of the
219 United States and a resident of this state and shall have no connection whatsoever with the
220 practice of dietetics or the practice of nutrition.
221 (c) The Governor may remove members of the board, after notice and opportunity for
222 hearing, for incompetence, neglect of duty, unprofessional conduct, conviction of any
H. B. 185
- 9 -

25 LC 52 0648
223 felony, failure to meet the qualifications of this chapter, or committing any act prohibited
224 by this chapter.
225 43-11A-6.
226 The board shall meet quarterly and shall elect from its members a chairperson, a vice
227 chairperson, and any other officers as deemed necessary who shall hold office according
228 to the rules adopted by the board. Additional meetings may be held upon the call of the
229 chairperson of the board or at the written request of any three members of the board. Board
230 meetings may be conducted by audio or video conference calls, and participation in such
231 conference call shall constitute attendance at the meeting so conducted.
232 43-11A-7.
233 The board shall have the power to:
234 (1) Enforce the provisions of this chapter, and it shall be granted all of the necessary
235 duties, powers, and authority to carry out this responsibility;
236 (2) Draft, adopt, amend, repeal, and enforce such rules as it deems necessary for the
237 administration and enforcement of this chapter in the protection of public health, safety,
238 and welfare;
239 (3) License duly qualified applicants by examination, endorsement, or reinstatement;
240 (4) Implement a disciplinary process;
241 (5) Enforce qualifications for licensure;
242 (6) Set standards for competency of licensees continuing in or returning to practice;
243 (7) Issue orders when a license is surrendered to the board while a complaint,
244 investigation, or disciplinary action against such license is pending;
245 (8) Adopt, revise, and enforce rules regarding advertising by licensees, including, but not
246 limited to, rules to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices;
247 (9) Adopt, publish in print or electronically, and enforce a code of ethics;
H. B. 185
- 10 -

25 LC 52 0648
248 (10) Establish examination and licensing fees;
249 (11) Request and receive the assistance of state educational institutions or other state
250 agencies;
251 (12) Prepare information of consumer interest describing the regulatory functions of the
252 board and describing the procedures by which consumer complaints are filed with and
253 resolved by the board. The board shall make such information available to the general
254 public and appropriate state agencies;
255 (13) Establish continuing education requirements;
256 (14) Adopt a seal which shall be affixed only in such manner as prescribed by the board;
257 (15) Conduct national background checks by the submission of fingerprints to the
258 Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Georgia Crime Information Center; provided,
259 however, that reports from such background checks shall not be shared with entities
260 outside of the state; and
261 (16) Administer the Dietitian Licensure Compact contained in Article 2 of this chapter.
262 43-11A-8.
263 The board may, in its discretion, grant, upon application and payment of fees, a license
264 without examination to an individual who, at the time of application, either:
265 (1) Holds a valid license or certification as a licensed or certified dietitian, dietitian
266 nutritionist, or nutritionist issued by another state, political territory, or jurisdiction
267 acceptable to the board if, in the board's opinion, the requirements for such license or
268 certification are substantially equal to or greater than licensure requirements provided for
269 under this chapter and rules and regulations promulgated by the board; or
270 (2) Applies for licensure as a licensed dietitian and presents evidence satisfactory to the
271 board that such individual is a registered dietitian.
H. B. 185
- 11 -

25 LC 52 0648
272 43-11A-9.
273 (a) Each applicant for a license as a licensed dietitian shall be at least 18 years of age,
274 submit a completed application upon a form and in such manner as the board prescribes,
275 pay any applicable fees, and be in compliance with the following requirements:
276 (1) Possession of a master's or doctoral degree and completion of a program of study
277 accredited by a programmatic accreditor;
278 (2) Satisfactory completion of a documented, supervised experience in the practice of
279 dietetics accredited by a programmatic accreditor, consisting of not less than 1,000 hours
280 of supervised practice under the supervision of a qualified supervisor as provided for in
281 Code Section 43-11A-19; provided, however, that an applicant shall complete such
282 experience within five years of earning the degree required under paragraph (1) of this
283 subsection; provided, further, that the board in its discretion may grant an extension for
284 a limited time for extraordinary circumstances;
285 (3) Successful completion of the examination for registered dietitians administered by
286 the Commission on Dietetic Registration of the Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics or
287 its successor organization; provided, however, that, if such successful completion
288 occurred more than five years before the license application, the applicant shall
289 demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board completion of 75 hours of continuing
290 education for each five-year period post-examination; and
291 (4) Completion of such other requirements as may be prescribed by the board.
292 (b) All individuals who are licensed dietitians and who have submitted an application for
293 licensure as a licensed dietitian prior to July 1, 2025, shall remain licensed so long as the
294 licensee remains in good standing and maintains an active or inactive license.
295 (c) Each applicant for a license as a licensed nutritionist shall be at least 18 years of age,
296 submit a completed application upon a form and in such manner as the board prescribes,
297 pay any applicable fees, and be in compliance with the following requirements:
H. B. 185
- 12 -

25 LC 52 0648
298 (1) Possession of a master's or doctoral degree with a major course of study in human
299 nutrition, food and nutrition, community nutrition, public health nutrition, nutrition
300 education, nutrition science, clinical nutrition, applied clinical nutrition, nutrition
301 counseling, nutrition and functional medicine, nutritional biochemistry, nutrition and
302 integrative health, or a comparable major or in a field of clinical healthcare, provided that
303 such applicant shall complete coursework leading to competence in medical nutrition
304 therapy, including, but not limited to:
305 (A) Fifteen semester hours of courses in clinical or life sciences, including at least
306 three semester hours in human anatomy and physiology or an equivalent subject; and
307 (B) Fifteen semester hours of courses in nutrition and metabolism, including at least
308 six semester hours in biochemistry;
309 (2) Satisfactory completion of a documented, continuous supervised practice experience
310 demonstrating competence in providing nutrition care services and medical nutrition
311 therapy approved by the board and meeting the following requirements:
312 (A) An applicant shall complete a supervised practice experience under this paragraph
313 within five years of earning the degree required under paragraph (1) of this subsection;
314 provided, however, that the board in its discretion may grant an extension for a limited
315 time for extraordinary circumstances; and
316 (B) A supervised practice experience under this paragraph shall:
317 (i) Involve at least 1,000 hours in the following practice areas, with a minimum
318 of 200 hours in each practice area: nutrition assessment, nutrition intervention, and
319 nutrition monitoring and evaluation;
320 (ii) Be under the supervision of a qualified supervisor as provided for in Code
321 Section 43-11A-19; and
322 (iii) Prepare an applicant, as determined by the board, to provide nutrition care
323 services to various populations of diverse cultures, genders, and ages, and to be able
324 to competently formulate actionable medical nutrition therapies and nutrition
H. B. 185
- 13 -

25 LC 52 0648
325 interventions, nutrition education, nutrition counseling, and ongoing nutrition care
326 services for the prevention, modulation, and management of a range of chronic
327 diseases and medical conditions;
328 (3) Satisfaction of examination requirements by:
329 (A) Successful completion of the certified nutrition specialist examination
330 administered by the Board for Certification of Nutrition Specialists of the American
331 Nutrition Association or its successor organization, or passage of an equivalent
332 examination on all aspects of the practice of nutrition that has been reviewed under a
333 program accredited by the National Commission for Certifying Agencies or its
334 successor organization or a credentialing entity recognized by the board by approval,
335 policy, or rule and that is approved by a two-thirds' vote of the board; provided,
336 however, that, if such successful completion occurred more than five years before the
337 license application, the applicant shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board
338 completion of 75 hours of continuing education for each five-year period
339 post-examination; or
340 (B) Demonstration that the applicant holds a valid current certification from the Board
341 for Certification of Nutrition Specialists of the American Nutrition Association or its
342 successor organization that allows the applicant to use the title 'certified nutrition
343 specialist'; and
344 (4) Completion of such other requirements as may be prescribed by the board.
345 43-11A-10.
346 (a) The board, in its discretion, may issue a provisional license for an individual to engage
347 in the practice of dietetics and the practice of nutrition for one year under the supervision
348 of a licensed dietitian upon the filing of an application with appropriate fees and
349 submission of evidence of successful completion of the education and supervised practice
H. B. 185
- 14 -

25 LC 52 0648
350 requirements for licensure provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 43-11A-9. Such
351 provisional license shall be valid for one year and shall not be renewed.
352 (b) The board, in its discretion, may issue a provisional license for an individual to engage
353 in the practice of nutrition for one year under the supervision of a licensed dietitian or
354 licensed nutritionist upon the filing of an application with appropriate fees and submission
355 of evidence of successful completion of the education and supervised practice requirements
356 for licensure provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 43-11A-9. Such provisional
357 license shall be valid for one year and shall not be renewed.
358 43-11A-11.
359 (a) As used in this Code section, the term 'conviction data' means a record of a finding or
360 verdict of guilty or plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime,
361 regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought, or a record of a
362 sentencing to first offender treatment without an adjudication of guilt.
363 (b) With respect to the provisions of Code Section 43-11A-15, the board shall be
364 authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to an applicant or licensee. The board
365 may require an applicant or licensee who has been convicted of, pled nolo contendere to,
366 or been granted first offender treatment upon being charged with any criminal offense other
367 than a traffic violation or any traffic violation that involved driving under the influence of
368 alcohol or drugs, homicide or feticide by vehicle, fleeing the scene of an accident,
369 attempting to elude a police officer, or impersonating a law enforcement officer to submit
370 to the board two complete sets of classifiable fingerprints of the applicant or licensee.
371 Upon receipt thereof, the board shall submit both sets of fingerprints to the Georgia Crime
372 Information Center which shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal
373 Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report. The
374 Georgia Crime Information Center shall retain the other set of fingerprints and promptly
375 conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. The Georgia Crime
H. B. 185
- 15 -

25 LC 52 0648
376 Information Center shall notify the board in writing of any derogatory finding, including,
377 but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check, or if there
378 is no such finding. All conviction data received by the board shall be used by it for the
379 exclusive purpose of carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter, shall not be a
380 public record, shall be privileged, and shall not be disclosed to any other person or agency.
381 (c) The board may require that all applications be made under oath.
382 43-11A-12.
383 After evaluation of an application and documents submitted, the board shall notify each
384 applicant that the application and documents submitted are satisfactory and accepted or
385 unsatisfactory and rejected. If the application and documents are unsatisfactory and
386 rejected, the notice shall state the reasons for the rejection.
387 43-11A-13.
388 (a) Examinations to determine qualifications for licensure as provided for in Code
389 Section 43-11A-9 shall be administered to qualified applicants at least twice each calendar
390 year. The examinations may be administered by a national testing service.
391 (b) The board shall notify each examinee of the results of the examination.
392 43-11A-14.
393 (a) A license issued by the board is the property of the board and shall be surrendered on
394 demand.
395 (b) The licensee shall display the license certificate in an appropriate and public manner.
396 (c) The licensee shall inform the board of any change of address.
397 (d) If a licensee is not in violation of this chapter at the time of application for renewal and
398 if such licensee fulfills current requirements of continuing education as established by the
399 board and pays any requisite fees, such license shall be renewed biennially.
H. B. 185
- 16 -

25 LC 52 0648
400 (e) Each licensee is responsible for renewing his or her license before the expiration date.
401 (f) Under procedures and conditions established by the board, a licensee may request that
402 his or her license be declared inactive; provided, however, that such licensee may apply for
403 active status at any time and, upon meeting the conditions set by the board, shall be
404 declared active.
405 43-11A-15.
406 The board may refuse to grant or renew a license to an applicant or licensee; administer a
407 public or private reprimand, but a private reprimand shall not be disclosed to any individual
408 except the licensee; suspend the license of any licensee for a definite period or for an
409 indefinite period in connection with any condition which may be attached to the restoration
410 of such license; limit or restrict the license of any licensee as the board deems necessary
411 for the protection of the public; revoke any license; condition a penalty upon, or withhold
412 formal disposition pending, the applicant's or licensee's submission to such care,
413 counseling, or treatment as the board may direct; or impose a fine not to exceed $500.00
414 for each violation of a law, rule, or regulation relating to the practice of dietetics or the
415 practice of nutrition upon a finding by a majority of the board that the applicant or licensee
416 has:
417 (1) Failed to demonstrate the qualifications or standards for a license contained in this
418 chapter or under the laws, rules, or regulations under which licensure is sought or held.
419 It shall be incumbent upon the applicant to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board
420 that such applicant meets all the requirements for the issuance of a license, and, if the
421 board is not satisfied as to the applicant's qualifications, it may deny a license without a
422 prior hearing; provided, however, that the applicant shall be allowed to appear before the
423 board if he or she so desires;
424 (2) Knowingly made misleading, deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent representations in the
425 practice of a business or profession licensed under this title or on any document
H. B. 185
- 17 -

25 LC 52 0648
426 connected therewith, or practiced fraud or deceit or intentionally made any false
427 statement in obtaining a license to practice the licensed business or profession, or made
428 a false statement or deceptive registration with the board;
429 (3) Been convicted of any felony or of any crime directly related to the duties and
430 responsibilities of a dietitian or nutritionist in the courts of this state or any other state,
431 territory, or country or in the courts of the United States; as used in this paragraph and
432 paragraph (4) of this Code section, the term 'felony' shall include any offense which, if
433 committed in this state, would be deemed a felony, without regard to its designation
434 elsewhere; and, as used in this paragraph, the term 'convicted' shall include a finding or
435 verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has
436 been sought;
437 (4) Been arrested, charged, and sentenced for the commission of any felony, or any crime
438 directly related to the duties and responsibilities of a dietitian or nutritionist where a plea
439 of nolo contendere was entered to the charge, first offender treatment without
440 adjudication of guilt pursuant to the charge was granted, or an adjudication or sentence
441 was otherwise withheld or not entered on the charge. The plea of nolo contendere or the
442 order entered pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42, relating to
443 probation of first offenders, or other first offender treatment shall be conclusive evidence
444 of arrest and sentencing for such crime;
445 (5) Had his or her license to practice a business or profession licensed under this title
446 revoked, suspended, or annulled by any lawful licensing authority other than the board;
447 had other disciplinary action taken against him or her by any such lawful licensing
448 authority other than the board; been denied a license by any such lawful licensing
449 authority other than the board, pursuant to disciplinary proceedings; or been refused the
450 renewal of a license by any such lawful licensing authority other than the board, pursuant
451 to disciplinary proceedings;
H. B. 185
- 18 -

25 LC 52 0648
452 (6) Engaged in any unprofessional, unethical, deceptive, or deleterious conduct or
453 practice harmful to the public, which conduct or practice materially affects the fitness of
454 the licensee or applicant to engage in the practice of dietetics or the practice of nutrition,
455 or of a nature likely to jeopardize the interest of the public, which conduct or practice
456 need not have resulted in actual injury to any person or be directly related to the practice
457 of dietetics or the practice of nutrition but shows that the licensee or applicant has
458 committed any act or omission which is indicative of untrustworthiness; unprofessional
459 conduct shall also include any departure from, or the failure to conform to, the minimal
460 standards of acceptable and prevailing practice of a business or profession licensed under
461 this title;
462 (7) Knowingly performed any act which in any way aids, assists, procures, advises, or
463 encourages any unlicensed individual or any licensee whose license has been suspended
464 or revoked by a professional licensing board to practice a business or profession licensed
465 under this title or to practice outside the scope of any disciplinary limitation placed upon
466 the licensee by the board;
467 (8) Violated a statute, law, or rule or regulation of this state, any other state, the
468 professional licensing board regulating the business or profession licensed under this title,
469 the United States, or any other lawful authority, without regard to whether the violation
470 is criminally punishable, which statute, law, or rule or regulation relates to or in part
471 regulates the practice of dietetics or the practice of nutrition, when the licensee or
472 applicant knows or should know that such action is violative of such statute, law, or rule
473 or regulation; or violated a lawful order of the board previously entered by the board in
474 a disciplinary hearing, consent decree, or license reinstatement;
475 (9) Been adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction within or
476 outside of this state; any such adjudication shall automatically suspend the license of any
477 such individual and shall prevent the reissuance or renewal of any license so suspended
478 for as long as the adjudication of incompetence is in effect; or
H. B. 185
- 19 -

25 LC 52 0648
479 (10) Displayed an inability to practice a business or profession licensed under this title
480 with reasonable skill and safety to the public or has become unable to practice the
481 licensed business or profession with reasonable skill and safety to the public by reason
482 of illness or use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material.
483 43-11A-16.
484 (a) Only a licensed dietitian or licensed nutritionist or a person authorized to engage in the
485 practice of dietetics or the practice of nutrition under this chapter shall engage in the
486 practice of dietetics or the practice of nutrition to the extent such services constitute
487 medical nutrition therapy.
488 (b) No individual shall designate or hold himself or herself out as a licensed dietitian; use
489 or assume the title 'dietitian,' 'licensed dietitian,' 'dietitian nutritionist,' or 'dietician'; use or
490 assume any other title indicating licensure; or append to or use in conjunction with that
491 individual's name the designation 'LD' or 'LDN,' unless the individual is a licensed dietitian
492 under this chapter.
493 (c) No individual shall designate or hold himself or herself out as a licensed nutritionist,
494 use or assume the title 'licensed nutritionist,' use or assume any other title indicating
495 licensure, or append to or use in conjunction with that individual's name the designation
496 'LN,' unless the individual is a licensed nutritionist under this chapter. No individual shall
497 designate or hold himself or herself out as a nutritionist unless the individual is licensed
498 under this chapter or exempt as provided in Code Section 43-11A-18.
499 (d) Use of an earned, federally trademarked nutrition credential is not prohibited.
500 (e) Any individual violating the provisions of this Code section shall be guilty of a
501 misdemeanor.
H. B. 185
- 20 -

25 LC 52 0648
502 43-11A-17.
503 Proceedings under this chapter shall be governed by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia
504 Administrative Procedure Act.'
505 43-11A-18.
506 Provided that the following individuals do not use titles protected under Code
507 Section 43-11A-16 unless otherwise authorized under this Code section, nothing in this
508 chapter shall be construed to affect:
509 (1) A supervisee who is practicing while being supervised by a qualified supervisor as
510 part of a course of study or a documented, continuous supervised practice experience;
511 provided, however, that such supervisee shall use a title that clearly indicates his or her
512 status as a supervisee and shall not engage in the unrestricted practice of medical nutrition
513 therapy;
514 (2) A dietitian or nutritionist serving in the armed forces of the United States or
515 employed by any other federal agency who is using government issued titles and who is
516 engaging in the practice of medical nutrition therapy, provided that such title use and
517 such practice are related to such individual's service or employment;
518 (3) An individual licensed to practice the profession of dentistry, medicine, osteopathy,
519 chiropractic, nursing, or pharmacy engaging in the practice of medical nutrition therapy
520 when incidental to the practice of his or her profession;
521 (4) An employee of a department, agency, or division of state, county, or local
522 government, or an individual contracting with any of the foregoing, who is providing
523 nutrition care services for welfare and public assistance programs under the Division of
524 Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services and who is
525 authorized to provide such services within the discharge of his or her official duties;
526 (5) An individual who assists in the provision of medical nutrition therapy, provided that
527 such individual performs only support activities that are not discretionary and do not
H. B. 185
- 21 -

25 LC 52 0648
528 require the exercise of professional judgment for their performance and such individual
529 is directly supervised by a licensed dietitian, licensed nutritionist, or healthcare provider
530 licensed in this state acting within the scope of such provider's license;
531 (6) An individual who provides medical weight control services for individuals with
532 obesity as part of:
533 (A) An instructional program that has been approved in writing by a licensed dietitian,
534 licensed nutritionist, or healthcare provider licensed in this state whose authorized
535 scope of practice includes medical nutrition therapy; or
536 (B) A plan of care that is overseen by a healthcare provider licensed in this state whose
537 scope of practice otherwise authorizes such provider to provide and delegate medical
538 nutrition therapy; provided, however, that the medical weight control services are not
539 discretionary and do not require the exercise of professional judgment;
540 (7) An individual who disseminates nonindividualized, written, general nutrition
541 information in connection with the marketing and distribution of dietary supplements,
542 food, herbs, or food materials, including, but not limited to, explanations of their federally
543 regulated label claims, any known drug-nutrient interactions, their role in various diets,
544 or suggestions as how to best use and combine them; provided, however, that such
545 information does not constitute medical nutrition therapy;
546 (8) An individual engaged in the practice of the tenets of any religion, sect, or
547 denomination; provided, however, that such individual does not provide nor represent
548 himself or herself as qualified to engage in medical nutrition therapy;
549 (9) An individual who provides individualized nutrition recommendations for general
550 health and wellness and the prevention of chronic disease, health coaching, holistic and
551 wellness education, guidance, motivation, behavior change management, services for
552 nonmedical weight control, or other nutrition care services, provided that such services
553 do not constitute medical nutrition therapy;
H. B. 185
- 22 -

25 LC 52 0648
554 (10) An individual who is an operator or employee of a health food store or business that
555 sells health products, including dietary supplements, food, herbs, or food materials, and
556 who provides verbal general nonmedical nutrition information that does not constitute
557 medical nutrition therapy; or
558 (11) A healthcare practitioner not located in this state who provides medical nutrition
559 therapy via telehealth to a patient located in this state, provided that such practitioner is
560 a healthcare practitioner licensed or certified in good standing with a scope of practice
561 that includes the provision of medical nutrition therapy and has a practitioner-patient
562 relationship with a patient who is temporarily located in this state; has a
563 practitioner-patient relationship with a patient who is located in this state and such care
564 is limited to temporary or short-term follow-up medical nutrition therapy to ensure
565 continuity of care; or is in consultation with a healthcare practitioner who has a
566 practitioner-patient relationship with the patient.
567 43-11A-19.
568 (a) A qualified supervisor shall:
569 (1) Only supervise a clinical activity or nutrition care service that the qualified supervisor
570 is authorized to perform;
571 (2) Develop and carry out a program for advancing and optimizing the quality of care
572 provided by the supervisee. A qualified supervisor and supervisee shall identify and
573 document goals for such supervised practice experience, the assignment of clinical tasks
574 as appropriate to such supervisee's evolving level of competence, such supervisee's
575 relationship and the amount and type of access to the qualified supervisor, and a process
576 for evaluating the supervisee's performance;
577 (3) Oversee the activities of and approve and accept responsibility for the nutrition care
578 services rendered by the supervisee;
H. B. 185
- 23 -

25 LC 52 0648
579 (4) At a minimum, be physically on-site and present where the supervisee is providing
580 nutrition care services or be immediately and continuously available to such supervisee
581 by means of two-way real-time audiovisual technology that allows for direct,
582 contemporaneous interaction by sight and sound between the qualified supervisor and
583 such supervisee; provided, however, that, if the qualified supervisor assigns to a
584 supervisee a nutrition care service that is to be provided in a setting where the qualified
585 supervisor is not routinely present, such qualified supervisor shall ensure that the means
586 and methods of supervision are adequate to ensure appropriate patient care, which may
587 include synchronous videoconferencing or another method of communication, and
588 oversight that is appropriate to the care setting and the education and experience of the
589 supervisee, as determined by the board by approval, policy, or rule;
590 (5) Review on a regular basis the charts, records, and clinical notes of any supervisee and
591 maintain responsibility for such supervisee's clinical record keeping;
592 (6) Be available to render assistance during the provision of nutrition care services when
593 requested by the patient; provided, however, that, if such qualified supervisor is not
594 available, such qualified supervisor shall arrange for another qualified healthcare provider
595 lawfully able to render nutrition care services to be available; and
596 (7) Limit the assignment of nutrition care services to those services that are within the
597 training and experience of the supervisee and customary to the practice of the qualified
598 supervisor.
599 (b) A qualified supervisor shall:
600 (1) Be licensed or certified in the state or territory where such supervised practice
601 experience occurs as a dietitian, nutritionist, dietitian nutritionist, or healthcare provider
602 whose scope of practice includes the provision of medical nutrition therapy;
603 (2) Meet such other criteria as the board may establish by rule or regulation when a state
604 or territory does not provide for licensure or certification of dietitians, dietitian
605 nutritionists, or nutritionists; or
H. B. 185
- 24 -

25 LC 52 0648
606 (3) Be an employee of the federal government authorized within the discharge of his or
607 her official duties to provide medical nutrition therapy and exempt from licensure as
608 provided for in paragraph (2) of Code Section 43-11A-18.
609 ARTICLE 2
610 43-11A-30.
611 This article shall be known and may be cited as the 'Dietitian Licensure Compact Act.'
612 43-11A-31.
613 The Dietitian Licensure Compact is enacted into law and entered into by the State of
614 Georgia with any and all other states legally joining therein in the form substantially as
615 follows:
616 'DIETITIAN LICENSURE COMPACT
617 SECTION 1. PURPOSE
618 The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate Practice of Dietetics with the goal of
619 improving public access to dietetics services. This Compact preserves the regulatory
620 authority of States to protect public health and safety through the current system of State
621 licensure, while also providing for licensure portability through a Compact Privilege granted
622 to qualifying professionals.
623 This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
624 A. Increase public access to dietetics services;
625 B. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by Licensed Dietitians who meet uniform
626 requirements;
H. B. 185
- 25 -

25 LC 52 0648
627 C. Eliminate the necessity for Licenses in multiple States;
628 D. Reduce administrative burden on Member States and Licensees;
629 E. Enhance the States' ability to protect the public's health and safety;
630 F. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in regulating multistate practice of
631 Licensed Dietitians;
632 G. Support relocating Active Military Members and their spouses;
633 H. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary information among
634 Member States; and
635 I. Vest all Member States with the authority to hold a Licensed Dietitian accountable for
636 meeting all State practice laws in the State in which the patient is located at the time care
637 is rendered.
638 SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
639 As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions shall
640 apply:
641 A. "ACEND" means the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and Dietetics
642 or its successor organization.
643 B. "Active Military Member" means any individual with full-time duty status in the active
644 armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve.
645 C. "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action
646 permitted by a State's laws which is imposed by a Licensing Authority or other authority
647 against a Licensee, including actions against an individual's License or Compact Privilege
648 such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the Licensee, limitation on the
649 Licensee's practice, or any other Encumbrance on licensure affecting a Licensee's
650 authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.
651 D. "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice remediation
652 process approved by a Licensing Authority.
H. B. 185
- 26 -

25 LC 52 0648
653 E. "Charter Member State" means any Member State which enacted this Compact by law
654 before the Effective Date specified in Section 12.
655 F. "Continuing Education" means a requirement, as a condition of License renewal, to
656 provide evidence of participation in, and completion of, educational and professional
657 activities relevant to practice or area of work.
658 G. "CDR" means the Commission on Dietetic Registration or its successor organization.
659 H. "Compact Commission" means the government agency whose membership consists of
660 all States that have enacted this Compact, which is known as the Dietitian Licensure
661 Compact Commission, as described in Section 8, and which shall operate as an
662 instrumentality of the Member States.
663 I. "Compact Privilege" means a legal authorization, which is equivalent to a License,
664 permitting the Practice of Dietetics in a Remote State.
665 J. "Current Significant Investigative Information" means:
666 1. Investigative Information that a Licensing Authority, after a preliminary inquiry that
667 includes notification and an opportunity for the subject Licensee to respond, if required
668 by State law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate
669 more than a minor infraction; or
670 2. Investigative Information that indicates that the subject Licensee represents an
671 immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the subject Licensee
672 has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
673 K. "Data System" means a repository of information about Licensees, including, but not
674 limited to, Continuing Education, examination, licensure, investigative, Compact Privilege
675 and Adverse Action information.
676 L. "Encumbered License" means a License in which an Adverse Action restricts a
677 Licensee's ability to practice dietetics.
678 M. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on a Licensee's
679 full and unrestricted Practice of Dietetics by a Licensing Authority.
H. B. 185
- 27 -

25 LC 52 0648
680 N. "Executive Committee" means a group of delegates elected or appointed to act on
681 behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, this Compact, and the Compact
682 Commission.
683 O. "Home State" means the Member State that is the Licensee's primary State of residence
684 or that has been designated pursuant to Section 6.
685 P. "Investigative Information" means information, records, and documents received or
686 generated by a Licensing Authority pursuant to an investigation.
687 Q. "Jurisprudence Requirement" means an assessment of an individual's knowledge of the
688 State laws and regulations governing the Practice of Dietetics in such State.
689 R. "License" means an authorization from a Member State to either:
690 1. Engage in the Practice of Dietetics (including medical nutrition therapy); or
691 2. Use the title "dietitian," "licensed dietitian," "licensed dietitian nutritionist," "certified
692 dietitian," or other title describing a substantially similar practitioner as the Compact
693 Commission may further define by Rule.
694 S. "Licensee" or "Licensed Dietitian" means an individual who currently holds a License
695 and who meets all of the requirements outlined in Section 4.
696 T. "Licensing Authority" means the board or agency of a State, or equivalent, that is
697 responsible for the licensing and regulation of the Practice of Dietetics.
698 U. "Member State" means a State that has enacted the Compact.
699 V. "Practice of Dietetics" means the synthesis and application of dietetics, primarily for
700 the provision of nutrition care services, including medical nutrition therapy, in person or
701 via telehealth, to prevent, manage, or treat diseases or medical conditions and promote
702 wellness.
703 W. "Registered Dietitian" means a person who:
704 1. Has completed applicable education, experience, examination, and recertification
705 requirements approved by CDR;
H. B. 185
- 28 -

25 LC 52 0648
706 2. Is credentialed by CDR as a registered dietitian or a registered dietitian nutritionist;
707 and
708 3. Is legally authorized to use the title registered dietitian or registered dietitian
709 nutritionist and the corresponding abbreviations "RD" or "RDN."
710 X. "Remote State" means a Member State other than the Home State, where a Licensee
711 is exercising or seeking to exercise a Compact Privilege.
712 Y. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by the Compact Commission that has the force
713 of law.
714 Z. "Single State License" means a License issued by a Member State within the issuing
715 State and does not include a Compact Privilege in any other Member State.
716 AA. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States of
717 America.
718 BB. "Unencumbered License" means a License that authorizes a Licensee to engage in the
719 full and unrestricted Practice of Dietetics.
720 SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
721 A. To participate in the Compact, a State must currently:
722 1. License and regulate the Practice of Dietetics; and
723 2. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about
724 Licensees.
725 B. A Member State shall:
726 1. Participate fully in the Compact Commission's Data System, including using the
727 unique identifier as defined in Rules;
728 2. Notify the Compact Commission, in compliance with the terms of the Compact and
729 Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of Current Significant Investigative
730 Information regarding a Licensee;
H. B. 185
- 29 -

25 LC 52 0648
731 3. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history record
732 information of applicants for an initial Compact Privilege. These procedures shall
733 include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants
734 for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information from the
735 Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that State's
736 criminal records;
737 a. A Member State must fully implement a criminal history record information
738 requirement, within a time frame established by Rule, which includes receiving the
739 results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search and shall use those results
740 in determining Compact Privilege eligibility.
741 b. Communication between a Member State and the Compact Commission or among
742 Member States regarding the verification of eligibility for a Compact Privilege shall not
743 include any information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to
744 a federal criminal history record information check performed by a Member State.
745 4. Comply with and enforce the Rules of the Compact Commission;
746 5. Require an applicant for a Compact Privilege to obtain or retain a License in the
747 Licensee's Home State and meet the Home State's qualifications for licensure or renewal
748 of licensure, as well as all other applicable State laws; and
749 6. Recognize a Compact Privilege granted to a Licensee who meets all of the
750 requirements outlined in Section 4 in accordance with the terms of the Compact and
751 Rules.
752 C. Member States may set and collect a fee for granting a Compact Privilege.
753 D. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall continue to be able to apply for a
754 Member State's Single State License as provided under the laws of each Member State.
755 However, the Single State License granted to these individuals shall not be recognized as
756 granting a Compact Privilege to engage in the Practice of Dietetics in any other Member
757 State.
H. B. 185
- 30 -

25 LC 52 0648
758 E. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a Member State
759 for the issuance of a Single State License.
760 F. At no point shall the Compact Commission have the power to define the requirements
761 for the issuance of a Single State License to practice dietetics. The Member States shall
762 retain sole jurisdiction over the provision of these requirements.
763 SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
764 A. To exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and provisions of the Compact, the
765 Licensee shall:
766 1. Satisfy one of the following:
767 a. Hold a valid current registration that gives the applicant the right to use the term
768 Registered Dietitian; or
769 b. Complete all of the following:
770 i. An education program which is either:
771 a) A master's degree or doctoral degree that is programmatically accredited by (i)
772 ACEND; or (ii) a dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States
773 Department of Education, which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine,
774 and from a college or university accredited at the time of graduation by the
775 appropriate regional accrediting agency recognized by the Council on Higher
776 Education Accreditation and the United States Department of Education.
777 b) An academic degree from a college or university in a foreign country equivalent
778 to the degree described in subparagraph (a) that is programmatically accredited
779 by (i) ACEND; or (ii) a dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States
780 Department of Education, which the Compact Commission may by Rule determine.
781 ii. A planned, documented, supervised practice experience in dietetics that is
782 programmatically accredited by (i) ACEND, or (ii) a dietetics accrediting agency
783 recognized by the United States Department of Education which the Compact
H. B. 185
- 31 -

25 LC 52 0648
784 Commission may by Rule determine and which involves at least 1000 hours of
785 practice experience under the supervision of a Registered Dietitian or a Licensed
786 Dietitian.
787 iii. Successful completion of either: (i) the Registration Examination for Dietitians
788 administered by CDR, or (ii) a national credentialing examination for dietitians
789 approved by the Compact Commission by Rule; such completion being no more than
790 five years prior to the date of the Licensee's application for initial licensure and
791 accompanied by a period of continuous licensure thereafter, all of which may be
792 further governed by the Rules of the Compact Commission.
793 2. Hold an Unencumbered License in the Home State;
794 3. Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege
795 within a Remote State(s);
796 4. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the Compact Privilege;
797 5. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the Remote State(s) in which the
798 Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege; and
799 6. Report to the Compact Commission any Adverse Action, Encumbrance, or restriction
800 on a License taken by any non-Member State within 30 days from the date the action is
801 taken.
802 B. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration date of the Home State License. To
803 maintain a Compact Privilege, renewal of the Compact Privilege shall be congruent with
804 the renewal of the Home State License as the Compact Commission may define by Rule.
805 The Licensee must comply with the requirements of Section 4(A) to maintain the Compact
806 Privilege in the Remote State(s).
807 C. A Licensee exercising a Compact Privilege shall adhere to the laws and regulations of
808 the Remote State. Licensees shall be responsible for educating themselves on, and
809 complying with, any and all State laws relating to the Practice of Dietetics in such Remote
810 State.
H. B. 185
- 32 -

25 LC 52 0648
811 D. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in this Compact or State law, a
812 Licensee exercising a Compact Privilege shall not be required to complete Continuing
813 Education Requirements required by a Remote State. A Licensee exercising a Compact
814 Privilege is only required to meet any Continuing Education Requirements as required by
815 the Home State.
816 SECTION 5. OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE LICENSE BASED ON A COMPACT
817 PRIVILEGE
818 A. A Licensee may hold a Home State License, which allows for a Compact Privilege in
819 other Member States, in only one Member State at a time.
820 B. If a Licensee changes Home State by moving between two Member States:
821 1. The Licensee shall file an application for obtaining a new Home State License based
822 on a Compact Privilege, pay all applicable fees, and notify the current and new Home
823 State in accordance with the Rules of the Compact Commission.
824 2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new Home State License by virtue of
825 a Compact Privilege, the new Home State shall verify that the Licensee meets the criteria
826 in Section 4 via the Data System, and require that the Licensee complete the following:
827 a. Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based criminal history record
828 information check;
829 b. Any other criminal history record information required by the new Home State; and
830 c. Any Jurisprudence Requirements of the new Home State.
831 3. The former Home State shall convert the former Home State License into a Compact
832 Privilege once the new Home State has activated the new Home State License in
833 accordance with applicable Rules adopted by the Compact Commission.
834 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if the Licensee cannot meet the
835 criteria in Section 4, the new Home State may apply its requirements for issuing a new
836 Single State License.
H. B. 185
- 33 -

25 LC 52 0648
837 5. The Licensee shall pay all applicable fees to the new Home State in order to be issued
838 a new Home State License.
839 C. If a Licensee changes their State of residence by moving from a Member State to a
840 non-Member State, or from a non-Member State to a Member State, the State criteria shall
841 apply for issuance of a Single State License in the new State.
842 D. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee's ability to hold a Single State
843 License in multiple States; however, for the purposes of this Compact, a Licensee shall
844 have only one Home State License.
845 E. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a Member State
846 for the issuance of a Single State License.
847 SECTION 6. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
848 An Active Military Member, or their spouse, shall designate a Home State where the
849 individual has a current License in good standing. The individual may retain the Home State
850 designation during the period the service member is on active duty.
851 SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS
852 A. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a Remote State shall have the
853 authority, in accordance with existing State due process law, to:
854 1. Take Adverse Action against a Licensee's Compact Privilege within that Member
855 State; and
856 2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and
857 testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a
858 Licensing Authority in a Member State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or
859 the production of evidence from another Member State shall be enforced in the latter
860 State by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure
861 applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before that court. The issuing
H. B. 185
- 34 -

25 LC 52 0648
862 authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by
863 the service statutes of the State in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
864 B. Only the Home State shall have the power to take Adverse Action against a Licensee's
865 Home State License.
866 C. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State shall give the same priority and
867 effect to reported conduct received from a Member State as it would if the conduct had
868 occurred within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State shall apply its own State laws
869 to determine appropriate action.
870 D. The Home State shall complete any pending investigations of a Licensee who changes
871 Home States during the course of the investigations. The Home State shall also have
872 authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of the
873 investigations to the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of the Data
874 System shall promptly notify the new Home State of any Adverse Actions.
875 E. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may recover from the affected
876 Licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any Adverse
877 Action taken against that Licensee.
878 F. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the factual findings of another
879 Remote State, provided that the Member State follows its own procedures for taking the
880 Adverse Action.
881 G. Joint Investigations:
882 1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its respective State law, any
883 Member State may participate with other Member States in joint investigations of
884 Licensees.
885 2. Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance materials in
886 furtherance of any joint investigation initiated under the Compact.
887 H. If Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against a Licensee's Home State License
888 resulting in an Encumbrance on the Home State License, the Licensee's Compact
H. B. 185
- 35 -

25 LC 52 0648
889 Privilege(s) in all other Member States shall be revoked until all Encumbrances have been
890 removed from the Home State License. All Home State disciplinary orders that impose
891 Adverse Action against a Licensee shall include a statement that the Licensee's Compact
892 Privileges are revoked in all Member States during the pendency of the order.
893 I. Once an Encumbered License in the Home State is restored to an Unencumbered
894 License (as certified by the Home State's Licensing Authority), the Licensee must meet the
895 requirements of Section 4(A) and follow the administrative requirements to reapply to
896 obtain a Compact Privilege in any Remote State.
897 J. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the
898 Data System. The administrator of the Data System shall promptly notify the other
899 Member States State of any Adverse Actions.
900 K. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's decision that participation in
901 an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse Action.
902 SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE DIETITIAN LICENSURE COMPACT
903 COMMISSION
904 A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint government agency
905 whose membership consists of all Member States that have enacted the Compact known
906 as the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission. The Compact Commission is an
907 instrumentality of the Compact States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one
908 State. The Compact Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date
909 of the Compact as set forth in Section 12.
910 B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
911 1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate selected by that
912 Member State's Licensing Authority.
913 2. The delegate shall be the primary administrator of the Licensing Authority or their
914 designee.
H. B. 185
- 36 -

25 LC 52 0648
915 3. The Compact Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
916 delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
917 4. The Compact Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any delegate
918 from office.
919 5. A Member State's Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate occurring
920 on the Compact Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
921 6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the Compact
922 Commission requiring a vote by the delegates.
923 7. Delegates shall meet and vote by such means as set forth in the bylaws. The bylaws
924 may provide for delegates to meet and vote in-person or by telecommunication, video
925 conference, or other means of communication.
926 8. The Compact Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
927 Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Compact Commission
928 may meet in person or by telecommunication, video conference, or other means of
929 communication.
930 C. The Compact Commission shall have the following powers:
931 1. Establish the fiscal year of the Compact Commission;
932 2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
933 3. Establish and amend Rules and bylaws;
934 4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
935 5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this Compact, the
936 Compact Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
937 6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the Compact
938 Commission, provided that the standing of any Licensing Authority to sue or be sued
939 under applicable law shall not be affected;
H. B. 185
- 37 -

25 LC 52 0648
940 7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member State as the
941 authenticated business records of the Compact Commission, and designate an agent to
942 do so on the Compact Commission's behalf;
943 8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
944 9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
945 employees of a Member State;
946 10. Conduct an annual financial review;
947 11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such
948 individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish
949 the Compact Commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of
950 interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
951 12. Assess and collect fees;
952 13. Accept any and all appropriate donations, grants of money, other sources of revenue,
953 equipment, supplies, materials, services, and gifts, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the
954 same; provided that at all times the Compact Commission shall avoid any actual or
955 appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
956 14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal, or
957 mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
958 15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of
959 any property real, personal, or mixed;
960 16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
961 17. Borrow money;
962 18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members, State
963 regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and
964 such other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact or the bylaws;
965 19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
966 agencies;
H. B. 185
- 38 -

25 LC 52 0648
967 20. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and a vice chair;
968 21. Determine whether a State's adopted language is materially different from the model
969 compact language such that the State would not qualify for participation in the Compact;
970 and
971 22. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the
972 purposes of this Compact.
973 D. The Executive Committee
974 1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Compact
975 Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and
976 responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
977 a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact including
978 enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its Rules and bylaws,
979 and other such duties as deemed necessary;
980 b. Recommend to the Compact Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws, changes
981 to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member States, fees charged to
982 Licensees, and other fees;
983 c. Ensure Compact administration services are appropriately provided, including by
984 contract;
985 d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
986 e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Compact Commission;
987 f. Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and provide compliance reports to
988 the Compact Commission;
989 g. Establish additional committees as necessary;
990 h. Exercise the powers and duties of the Compact Commission during the interim
991 between Compact Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending Rules,
992 adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly
993 reserved to the Compact Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
H. B. 185
- 39 -

25 LC 52 0648
994 i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Compact Commission.
995 2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine members:
996 a. The chair and vice chair of the Compact Commission shall be voting members of the
997 Executive Committee;
998 b. Five voting members from the current membership of the Compact Commission,
999 elected by the Compact Commission;
1000 c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized professional association
1001 representing dietitians; and
1002 d. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national credentialing
1003 organization for dietitians.
1004 3. The Compact Commission may remove any member of the Executive Committee as
1005 provided in the Compact Commission's bylaws.
1006 4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
1007 a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Executive
1008 Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subsection (F)(2).
1009 b. The Executive Committee shall give 30 days' notice of its meetings, posted on the
1010 website of the Compact Commission and as determined to provide notice to persons
1011 with an interest in the business of the Compact Commission.
1012 c. The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with
1013 subsection (F)(1)(b).
1014 E. The Compact Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an annual
1015 report.
1016 F. Meetings of the Compact Commission
1017 1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Compact Commission may
1018 meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subsection (F)(2).
H. B. 185
- 40 -

25 LC 52 0648
1019 a. Public notice for all meetings of the full Compact Commission shall be given in the
1020 same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Section 10, except that the
1021 Compact Commission may hold a special meeting as provided in subsection (F)(1)(b).
1022 b. The Compact Commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to conduct
1023 emergency business by giving 24 hours' notice to all Member States, on the Compact
1024 Commission's website, and other means as provided in the Compact Commission's
1025 Rules. The Compact Commission's legal counsel shall certify that the Compact
1026 Commission's need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
1027 2. The Compact Commission or the Executive Committee or other committees of the
1028 Compact Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the Compact
1029 Commission or Executive Committee or other committees of the Compact Commission
1030 to receive legal advice or to discuss:
1031 a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the Compact;
1032 b. The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters, practices, or
1033 procedures related to specific employees;
1034 c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the Compact Commission or by a
1035 Member State's Licensing Authority;
1036 d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
1037 e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real
1038 estate;
1039 f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
1040 g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
1041 confidential;
1042 h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
1043 unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
1044 i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
H. B. 185
- 41 -

25 LC 52 0648
1045 j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use
1046 of the Compact Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of
1047 investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
1048 k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or Member State law; or
1049 l. Other matters as specified in the Rules of the Compact Commission.
1050 3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state that the
1051 meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such
1052 reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
1053 4. The Compact Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all
1054 matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions
1055 taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All
1056 documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes.
1057 All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release
1058 only by a majority vote of the Compact Commission or order of a court of competent
1059 jurisdiction.
1060 G. Financing of the Compact Commission
1061 1. The Compact Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
1062 expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
1063 2. The Compact Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as
1064 provided in subsection (C)(13).
1065 3. The Compact Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
1066 Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom it grants a
1067 Compact Privilege to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Compact
1068 Commission and its staff, which must, in a total amount, be sufficient to cover its annual
1069 budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The
1070 aggregate annual assessment amount for Member States shall be allocated based upon a
1071 formula that the Compact Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
H. B. 185
- 42 -

25 LC 52 0648
1072 4. The Compact Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the
1073 funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Compact Commission pledge the credit
1074 of any of the Member States, except by and with the authority of the Member State.
1075 5. The Compact Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
1076 disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Compact Commission shall be
1077 subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its bylaws.
1078 However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Compact Commission
1079 shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public accountant,
1080 and the report of the financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual
1081 report of the Compact Commission.
1082 H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1083 1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the
1084 Compact Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in
1085 their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury
1086 or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
1087 omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
1088 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission
1089 employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
1090 construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury,
1091 or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
1092 procurement of insurance of any type by the Compact Commission shall not in any way
1093 compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
1094 2. The Compact Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
1095 employee, and representative of the Compact Commission in any civil action seeking to
1096 impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
1097 within the scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as
1098 determined by the Compact Commission that the person against whom the claim is made
H. B. 185
- 43 -

25 LC 52 0648
1099 had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission
1100 employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed
1101 to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and
1102 provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that
1103 person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
1104 3. The Compact Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer,
1105 executive director, employee, and representative of the Compact Commission for the
1106 amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any
1107 actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Compact
1108 Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable
1109 basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment,
1110 duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did
1111 not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
1112 4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any Licensee for
1113 professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other
1114 applicable State laws.
1115 5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a Member
1116 State's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust
1117 claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or
1118 anticompetitive law or regulation.
1119 6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by
1120 the Member States or by the Compact Commission.
1121 SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM
1122 A. The Compact Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation,
1123 and utilization of a coordinated Data System.
H. B. 185
- 44 -

25 LC 52 0648
1124 B. The Compact Commission shall assign each applicant for a Compact Privilege a unique
1125 identifier, as determined by the Rules.
1126 C. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a Member State shall
1127 submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is
1128 applicable as required by the Rules of the Compact Commission, including:
1129 1. Identifying information;
1130 2. Licensure data;
1131 3. Adverse Actions against a License or Compact Privilege and information related
1132 thereto;
1133 4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program participation, the
1134 beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to such
1135 participation not made confidential under Member State law;
1136 5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s) for such denial;
1137 6. The presence of Current Significant Investigative Information; and
1138 7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or the
1139 protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Compact Commission.
1140 D. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant to this Compact or
1141 through the Data System, when certified by the Compact Commission or an agent thereof,
1142 shall constitute the authenticated business records of the Compact Commission, and shall
1143 be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or
1144 administrative proceedings in a Member State.
1145 E. Current Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member
1146 State will only be available to other Member States.
1147 F. It is the responsibility of the Member States to report any Adverse Action against a
1148 Licensee and to monitor the Data System to determine whether any Adverse Action has
1149 been taken against a Licensee. Adverse Action information pertaining to a Licensee in any
1150 Member State will be available to any other Member State.
H. B. 185
- 45 -

25 LC 52 0648
1151 G. Member States contributing information to the Data System may designate information
1152 that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing
1153 State.
1154 H. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged pursuant
1155 to federal law or the laws of the Member State contributing the information shall be
1156 removed from the Data System.
1157 SECTION 10. RULEMAKING
1158 A. The Compact Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to effectively
1159 and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the Compact. A
1160 Rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction
1161 holds that the Rule is invalid because the Compact Commission exercised its rulemaking
1162 authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers
1163 granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
1164 B. The Rules of the Compact Commission shall have the force of law in each Member
1165 State, provided however that where the Rules conflict with the laws or regulations of a
1166 Member State that relate to the procedures, actions, and processes a Licensed Dietitian is
1167 permitted to undertake in that State and the circumstances under which they may do so, as
1168 held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Compact Commission shall be
1169 ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
1170 C. The Compact Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria
1171 set forth in this Section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding on
1172 the day following adoption or as of the date specified in the Rule or amendment, whichever
1173 is later.
1174 D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a Rule or portion of a Rule,
1175 by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact
H. B. 185
- 46 -

25 LC 52 0648
1176 within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no
1177 further force and effect in any Member State.
1178 E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Compact Commission.
1179 F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Compact Commission shall hold a public
1180 hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and
1181 arguments.
1182 G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Compact Commission, and at least
1183 thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Compact Commission will hold a
1184 public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Compact Commission shall provide a Notice of
1185 Proposed rulemaking:
1186 1. On the website of the Compact Commission or other publicly accessible platform;
1187 2. To persons who have requested notice of the Compact Commission's notices of
1188 proposed rulemaking; and
1189 3. In such other way(s) as the Compact Commission may by Rule specify.
1190 H. The Notice of Proposed rulemaking shall include:
1191 1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Compact Commission
1192 will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if different, the time, date, and
1193 location of the meeting where the Compact Commission will consider and vote on the
1194 proposed Rule;
1195 2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other means of
1196 communication, the Compact Commission shall include the mechanism for access to the
1197 hearing in the Notice of Proposed rulemaking;
1198 3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefore;
1199 4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person; and
1200 5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
H. B. 185
- 47 -

25 LC 52 0648
1201 I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and
1202 documents received by the Compact Commission in response to the proposed Rule shall
1203 be available to the public.
1204 J. Nothing in this Section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each Rule.
1205 Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Compact Commission at hearings
1206 required by this Section.
1207 K. The Compact Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on
1208 the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the Rule.
1209 1. The Compact Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided the
1210 changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
1211 2. The Compact Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive
1212 changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made
1213 that were recommended by commenters.
1214 3. The Compact Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the Rule.
1215 Except for an emergency as provided in Section 10(L), the effective date of the Rule shall
1216 be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
1217 L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Compact Commission may consider
1218 and adopt an emergency Rule with 24 hours' notice, with opportunity to comment, provided
1219 that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this Section shall be
1220 retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than
1221 ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
1222 emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1223 1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
1224 2. Prevent a loss of Compact Commission or Member State funds;
1225 3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is established by federal law or
1226 rule; or
1227 4. Protect public health and safety.
H. B. 185
- 48 -

25 LC 52 0648
1228 M. The Compact Commission or an authorized committee of the Compact Commission
1229 may direct revision to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting typographical
1230 errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any
1231 revision shall be posted on the website of the Compact Commission. The revision shall be
1232 subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The
1233 revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change
1234 to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the Compact Commission
1235 prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect
1236 without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect
1237 without the approval of the Compact Commission.
1238 N. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this Compact.
1239 SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
1240 A. Oversight
1241 1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in each Member State shall
1242 enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement this
1243 Compact.
1244 2. Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue is proper and judicial
1245 proceedings by or against the Compact Commission shall be brought solely and
1246 exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the Compact
1247 Commission is located. The Compact Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional
1248 defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution
1249 proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in
1250 any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such
1251 similar matter.
1252 3. The Compact Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
1253 proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and shall have
H. B. 185
- 49 -

25 LC 52 0648
1254 standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the
1255 Compact Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the
1256 Compact Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
1257 B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1258 1. If the Compact Commission determines that a Member State has defaulted in the
1259 performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated
1260 Rules, the Compact Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting State. The
1261 notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default, and
1262 any other action that the Compact Commission may take and shall offer training and
1263 specific technical assistance regarding the default.
1264 2. The Compact Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other
1265 Member States.
1266 C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be terminated from
1267 the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the Member States,
1268 and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that State by this Compact may be
1269 terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the
1270 offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
1271 D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other means
1272 of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall
1273 be given by the Compact Commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders
1274 of the defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's Licensing Authority, and each of
1275 the Member States' Licensing Authority.
1276 E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and
1277 liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that
1278 extend beyond the effective date of termination.
1279 F. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this Compact, that State shall
1280 immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that State of such termination. The
H. B. 185
- 50 -

25 LC 52 0648
1281 terminated State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges granted pursuant to this
1282 Compact for a minimum of six months after the date of said notice of termination.
1283 G. The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is found to be
1284 in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing
1285 between the Compact Commission and the defaulting State.
1286 H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Compact Commission by petitioning
1287 the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
1288 Compact Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all
1289 costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
1290 I. Dispute Resolution
1291 1. Upon request by a Member State, the Compact Commission shall attempt to resolve
1292 disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member States and between Member
1293 and non-Member States.
1294 2. The Compact Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both mediation and
1295 binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
1296 J. Enforcement
1297 1. By supermajority vote, the Compact Commission may initiate legal action against a
1298 Member State in default in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
1299 or the federal district where the Compact Commission has its principal offices to enforce
1300 compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief
1301 sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement
1302 is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
1303 reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the
1304 Compact Commission. The Compact Commission may pursue any other remedies
1305 available under federal or the defaulting Member State's law.
1306 2. A Member State may initiate legal action against the Compact Commission in the U.S.
1307 District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Compact
H. B. 185
- 51 -

25 LC 52 0648
1308 Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
1309 Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief
1310 and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall
1311 be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
1312 3. No party other than a Member State shall enforce this Compact against the Compact
1313 Commission.
1314 SECTION 12. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
1315 A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact statute is
1316 enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
1317 1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Compact Commission shall convene
1318 and review the enactment of each of the first seven Member States ("Charter Member
1319 States") to determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter Member State is
1320 materially different than the model Compact statute.
1321 a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially different from
1322 the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in
1323 Section 11.
1324 b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is terminated, or withdraws
1325 from the Compact, the Compact Commission shall remain in existence and the
1326 Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of Member States should be less than
1327 seven.
1328 2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven initial Charter Member
1329 States shall be subject to the process set forth in Section 8(C)(21) to determine if their
1330 enactments are materially different from the model Compact statute and whether they
1331 qualify for participation in the Compact.
1332 3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Compact Commission or in furtherance of the
1333 purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact
H. B. 185
- 52 -

25 LC 52 0648
1334 or the Compact Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of
1335 the Compact Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Compact Commission.
1336 4. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Compact Commission's initial
1337 adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Rules and bylaws as they exist
1338 on the date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been
1339 previously adopted by the Compact Commission shall have the full force and effect of
1340 law on the day the Compact becomes law in that State.
1341 B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing
1342 the same.
1343 1. A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after enactment of
1344 the repealing statute.
1345 2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing State's
1346 Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action reporting
1347 requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
1348 3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a State shall
1349 immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State.
1350 Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
1351 State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges granted pursuant to this Compact
1352 for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
1353 C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
1354 licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member State and a
1355 non-Member State that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
1356 D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to this Compact
1357 shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws
1358 of all Member States.
H. B. 185
- 53 -

25 LC 52 0648
1359 SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
1360 A. This Compact and the Compact Commission's rulemaking authority shall be liberally
1361 construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the implementation and administration of the
1362 Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation
1363 of Rules shall not be construed to limit the Compact Commission's rulemaking authority
1364 solely for those purposes.
1365 B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence,
1366 or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to
1367 the constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of
1368 the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or
1369 circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity
1370 of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government,
1371 agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
1372 C. Notwithstanding Section 13(B), the Compact Commission may deny a State's
1373 participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of Section 11(B),
1374 terminate a Member State's participation in the Compact, if it determines that a
1375 constitutional requirement of a Member State is a material departure from the Compact.
1376 Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any Member
1377 State, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining Member States
1378 and in full force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all severable matters.
1379 SECTION 14. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
1380 A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a Member
1381 State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
1382 B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Member State in
1383 conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
H. B. 185
- 54 -

25 LC 52 0648
1384 C. All permissible agreements between the Compact Commission and the Member States
1385 are binding in accordance with their terms.'"
1386 PART II
1387 Conforming cross-references
1388 SECTION 2-1.
1389 Title 9 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to civil practice, is amended in
1390 Code Section 9-11-9.1, relating to affidavit to accompany charge of professional malpractice,
1391 by revising paragraph (8) of subsection (g) as follows:
1392 "(8) Dietitians Licensed dietitians or licensed nutritionists;"
1393 SECTION 2-2.
1394 Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to health, is amended in Code
1395 Section 31-7-351, relating to definitions relative to Georgia Long-term Care Background
1396 Check Program, by revising paragraph (7) as follows:
1397 "(7) 'Employee' means any individual who has direct access and who is hired by a facility
1398 through employment, or through a contract with such facility, including, but not limited
1399 to, housekeepers, maintenance personnel, dieticians, and any volunteer who has duties
1400 that are equivalent to the duties of an employee providing such services. Such term shall
1401 not include an individual who contracts with the facility, whether personally or through
1402 a company, to provide utility, construction, communications, accounting, quality
1403 assurance, human resource management, information technology, legal, or other services
1404 if the contracted services are not directly related to providing services to a patient,
1405 resident, or client of the facility. Such term shall not include any healthcare provider,
1406 including, but not limited to, physicians, dentists, nurses, and pharmacists, and dietitians
1407 who are licensed by the Georgia Composite Medical Board, the Georgia Board of
H. B. 185
- 55 -

25 LC 52 0648
1408 Dentistry, the Georgia Board of Nursing, or the State Board of Pharmacy, or the Georgia
1409 Board of Examiners of Licensed Dietitians and Licensed Nutritionists."
1410 SECTION 2-3.
1411 Said title is further amended in Code Section 31-8-192, relating to definitions relative to
1412 "health share" volunteers in medicine, by revising subparagraph (N) of paragraph (5) as
1413 follows:
1414 "(N) A dietitian or nutritionist licensed under Chapter 11A of Title 43;"
1415 SECTION 2-4.
1416 Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to insurance, is amended in Code
1417 Section 33-20A-3, relating to definitions relative to patient protection, by revising
1418 paragraph (5) as follows:
1419 "(5) 'Healthcare provider' or 'provider' means any physician, dentist, podiatrist,
1420 pharmacist, optometrist, psychologist, clinical social worker, advanced practice registered
1421 nurse, registered optician, licensed professional counselor, physical therapist, marriage
1422 and family therapist, chiropractor, athletic trainer qualified pursuant to Code
1423 Section 43-5-8, occupational therapist, speech language pathologist, audiologist, licensed
1424 dietitian, licensed nutritionist, or physician assistant."
1425 SECTION 2-5.
1426 Said title is further amended in Code Section 33-20E-2, relating to application to insurers and
1427 definitions relative to surprise billing consumer protection, by revising paragraph (9) of
1428 subsection (b) as follows:
1429 "(9) 'Healthcare provider' or 'provider' means any physician, other individual, or facility
1430 other than a hospital licensed or otherwise authorized in this state to furnish healthcare
H. B. 185
- 56 -

25 LC 52 0648
1431 services, including, but not limited to, any dentist, podiatrist, optometrist, psychologist,
1432 clinical social worker, advanced practice registered nurse, registered optician, licensed
1433 professional counselor, physical therapist, marriage and family therapist, chiropractor,
1434 athletic trainer qualified pursuant to Code Section 43-5-8, occupational therapist,
1435 speech-language pathologist, audiologist, licensed dietitian, licensed nutritionist, or
1436 physician assistant."
1437 SECTION 2-6.
1438 Said title is further amended in Code Section 33-24-59.27, relating to right to shop for
1439 insurance coverage, disclosure of pricing information, and notice, by revising paragraph (4)
1440 of subsection (b) as follows:
1441 "(4) 'Healthcare provider' or 'provider' means any physician, dentist, podiatrist,
1442 pharmacist, optometrist, psychologist, clinical social worker, advanced practice registered
1443 nurse, registered optician, licensed professional counselor, physical therapist, marriage
1444 and family therapist, chiropractor, athletic trainer qualified pursuant to Code
1445 Section 43-5-8, occupational therapist, speech language pathologist, audiologist, licensed
1446 dietitian, licensed nutritionist, or physician assistant."
1447 SECTION 2-7.
1448 Said title is further amended in Code Section 33-39-3, relating to definitions relative to
1449 collection, use, and disclosure of information gathered by insurance institutions, by revising
1450 paragraph (16) as follows:
1451 "(16) 'Medical professional' means any person licensed or certified to provide healthcare
1452 services to natural persons, including, but not limited to, a chiropractor, clinical licensed
1453 dietitian, licensed nutritionist, clinical psychologist, dentist, nurse, occupational therapist,
1454 optometrist, pharmacist, physical therapist, physician, podiatrist, psychiatric social
1455 worker, or speech therapist."
H. B. 185
- 57 -

25 LC 52 0648
1456 SECTION 2-8.
1457 Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to professions and businesses,
1458 is amended in Code Section 43-1-28, relating to volunteers in healthcare specialties, by
1459 revising paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (b) as follows:
1460 "(2) 'Healthcare practitioner' means a chiropractor, registered professional nurse,
1461 podiatrist, optometrist, professional counselor, social worker, marriage and family
1462 therapist, occupational therapist, physical therapist, physician assistant, licensed practical
1463 nurse, certified nurse midwife, pharmacist, speech-language pathologist, audiologist,
1464 psychologist, or licensed dietitian, or licensed nutritionist.
1465 (3) 'Healthcare specialty' means the practice of chiropractic, nursing, podiatry,
1466 optometry, professional counseling, social work, marriage and family therapy,
1467 occupational therapy, physical therapy, physician assistance, midwifery, pharmacy,
1468 speech-language pathology, audiology, psychology, or dietetics, or nutrition."
1469 SECTION 2-9.
1470 Said title is further amended in Code Section 43-1-33, relating to advertisement, signage, and
1471 identifier requirements for healthcare practitioners, by revising subparagraph (c)(5)(D) as
1472 follows:
1473 "(D) Dietitian or nutritionist licensed or registered pursuant to Chapter 11A of this
1474 title;"
1475 SECTION 2-10.
1476 Said title is further amended in Code Section 43-34-316, relating to exceptions relative to
1477 genetic counselor licensure, by revising paragraph (5) as follows:
1478 "(5) Any person using genetic data for purposes of nutritional counseling who is licensed
1479 as a dietitian or nutritionist under Chapter 11A of this title or exempt from such licensure
1480 pursuant to paragraph (10) of Code Section 43-11A-18."
H. B. 185
- 58 -

25 LC 52 0648
1481 SECTION 2-11.
1482 Title 51 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to torts, is amended in Code
1483 Section 51-2-5.1, relating to relationship between hospital and healthcare provider
1484 prerequisite to liability, notice regarding independent contractor status, and factors for
1485 consideration in determining status, by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (a) as follows:
1486 "(1) 'Healthcare professional' means a professional licensed as an audiologist,
1487 chiropractor, clinical social worker, dentist, licensed dietitian, licensed nutritionist,
1488 medical doctor, marriage and family therapist, registered professional or licensed
1489 practical nurse, occupational therapist, optometrist, osteopathic physician, pharmacist,
1490 physical therapist, physician assistant, professional counselor, podiatrist, psychologist,
1491 radiological technician, respiratory therapist, or speech-language pathologist."
1492 SECTION 2-12.
1493 Said title is further amended in Code Section 51-16-1, relating to definitions relative to
1494 pandemic business safety, by revising paragraph (6) as follows:
1495 "(6) 'Healthcare provider' means any physician or other person licensed or otherwise
1496 authorized in this state to furnish healthcare services, including, but not limited to, any
1497 dentist, podiatrist, optometrist, pharmacist, psychologist, clinical social worker, advanced
1498 practice registered nurse, registered optician, licensed professional counselor, physical
1499 therapist, massage therapist, marriage and family therapist, chiropractor, athletic trainer
1500 qualified pursuant to Code Section 43-5-7, occupational therapist, speech-language
1501 pathologist, audiologist, licensed dietitian, licensed nutritionist, physician assistant,
1502 cardiac technician, emergency medical technician, paramedic, or related parties."
H. B. 185
- 59 -

25 LC 52 0648
1503 PART III
1504 Effective date and repealer
1505 SECTION 3-1.
1506 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
1507 without such approval.
1508 SECTION 3-2.
1509 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 185
- 60 -